Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 401.052 is amended to read:
401.052. (1) The Oregon Department of Emergency Management is established.
(2) The department shall be responsible for:
(a) Coordinating and facilitating private sector and governmental efforts to  prevent, prepare for,
respond to and recover from emergencies; and
(b) Coordinating exercises and training, planning, preparedness, response, mitigation and  recov-
ery activities with state and local emergency services agencies and organizations.
(3) The department may purchase or contract for any materials, supplies or equipment,
including motor vehicles, that  the department deems necessary to carry out the duties of the
department.
[(3)] (4) The department shall prepare a  statewide emergency management plan and update the
plan from time to time as necessary.
Enrolled Senate Bill 823 (SB 823-INTRO) Page 1
Passed by Senate March 17, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House May 20, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 823 (SB 823-INTRO) Page 2